Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-682
Applicant; agreement with other water users; filing.

The applicant may negotiate with any user of water in order to obtain an agreement whereby the user waives any cause of action against the applicant for damages or injunctive or other relief for interference with such water use, in exchange for financial payment, substitute water, or other compensation. The applicant shall file copies of any such agreements with the Chief Water Officer who shall consider the agreements in determining whether to grant or deny a permit. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any power of eminent domain possessed by an applicant.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 195.